Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1402
State Treasurer; establish achieving a better life program or contract with another state.

(1) For purposes of administering accounts established to encourage and assist individuals and families in saving private funds for the purpose of supporting individuals with disabilities, the State Treasurer shall either establish the achieving a better life experience program as provided in sections 77-1403 to 77-1409 or contract with another state with a qualified program. The State Treasurer may enter into a contract with any contracting state to allow any resident of the contracting state to participate in the program established by the State Treasurer. Money from the Treasury Management Cash Fund may be appropriated for a program pursuant to section 77-1407 and to contract with another state with a qualified program under this section.

(2) Under a qualified program, one or more persons may make contributions to an account to meet the qualified disability expenses of the designated beneficiary of the account.

(3) If the State Treasurer establishes the program as authorized in this section, sections 77-1403 to 77-1409 apply.

Laws 2015, LB591, § 2.